Hawaii statutes.
[§482D-10] Injunctive relief and suits.
(a) Any competitor, customer, or competitor of a customer of any person in
violation of this chapter, or any subsequent purchaser of an article of
merchandise which violates this chapter shall be entitled to injunctive relief
restraining further violations and may sue as the real party in interest in any
circuit court of the State, and shall recover damages and the cost of suit,
including reasonable attorney's fees.

(b) If the court determines that the action was
brought frivolously, for purposes [of] harassment, or in implementation of any
scheme in restraint in trade, it may award court costs, reasonable attorney's
fees and any other remedies, including punitive damages, the court deems
reasonable.

(c) Any defendant against whom a civil action
is brought under the provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to recover
the cost of defending the suit, including a reasonable attorney's fee, in the
event such action is terminated without a finding by the court that such
defendant is or has been in violation of this chapter. [L 1990, c 343, pt of
§2]

Cross References

Vexatious litigants, see chapter 634J.

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next